District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

21-1110

Liability of estate of public patient for maintenance.

Repealed.

History

Sept. 14, 1965, 79 Stat. 769, Pub. L. 89-183, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 568, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 150(g)(1)(A)
Oct. 22, 1970, 84 Stat. 1087, Pub. L. 91-490, § 2(a)(1), (2), (5)
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-169, § 21(e)(5), 59 DCR 5567

Cross References

Care and treatment expenses, right to setoff, see § 4-603.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 21-1110.
1973 Ed., § 21-1110.

References in Text

Section 21-1108A, referred to in the first sentence of this section, was repealed by the Act of March 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-137, § 604(a)(1).

Editor's Notes

Section 35 of D.C. Law 19-169 provided that no provision of the act shall impair any right or obligation existing under law.